Washington statutes.
RCW 11.114.130

Powers of custodian.

(1) A custodian, acting in a custodial capacity, has all the rights, powers, and authority over custodial property that unmarried adult owners have over their own property, including without limitation all the powers granted to a trustee under RCW 11.98.070, but a custodian may exercise those rights, powers, and authority only in a custodial capacity.

(2) This section does not relieve a custodian from liability for breach of RCW 11.114.120.

[ 1991 c 193 s 13.]